ro-RO: Clasa de tensiune a bateriei: 12V; 144V; Clasa 200–300 V; Clasa 400 V; 48V; 72V; Clasa 800 V; 96V; Altele
fr: Classe de tension de la batterie: 12 V; 144 V; Catégorie 200–300 V; Catégorie 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Catégorie 800 V; 96 V; Autre
th: ระดับแรงดันไฟฟ้าของแบตเตอรี่: 12V; 144V; คลาส 200–300V; คลาส 400V; 48V; 72V; คลาส 800V; 96V; อื่นๆ
en: Battery voltage class: 12V; 144V; 200–300V class; 400V class; 48V; 72V; 800V class; 96V; Other
zh-CN: 电池电压等级: 12V; 144V; 200-300V 级; 400V 级; 48V; 72V; 800V 级; 96V; 其他
pl: Klasa napięcia akumulatora: 12 V; 144 V; Klasa 200–300 V; Klasa 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Klasa 800 V; 96 V; Inne
da: Batterispændingsklasse: 12 V; 144 V; 200-300 V-klasse; 400 V-klasse; 48 V; 72 V; 800 V-klasse; 96 V; Andet
de: Batteriespannungsklasse: 12 V; 144 V; 200–300V-Klasse; 400V-Klasse; 48 V; 72 V; 800V-Klasse; 96 V; Sonstige
it: Classe di tensione della batteria: 12V; 144V; Classe 200–300V; Classe 400V; 48V; 72V; Classe 800V; 96V; Altro
sv: Batterispänningsklass: 12 V; 144 V; 200 – 300 V-klass; 400 V-klass; 48 V; 72 V; 800 V-klass; 96 V; Övrigt
cs: Napěťová třída baterie: 12 V; 144 V; Třída 200–300 V; Třída 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Třída 800 V; 96 V; Jiné
zh-TW: 電池電壓等級: 12V; 144V; 200–300V 級; 400V 級; 48V; 72V; 800V 級; 96V; 其他
bg-BG: Клас на напрежение на батерията: 12 V; 144 V; Клас 200 – 300 V; Клас 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Клас 800 V; 96 V; Друго
hr-HR: Klasa napona baterije: 12V; 144V; Klasa 200 – 300 V; Klasa 400 V; 48V; 72V; Klasa 800 V; 96V; Ostalo
fi: Akun jänniteluokka: 12 V; 144 V; 200–300 V:n luokka; 400 V:n luokka; 48 V; 72 V; 800 V:n luokka; 96 V; Muu
pt-PT: Classe de tensão da bateria: 12 V; 144 V; Classe de 200–300 V; Classe de 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Classe de 800 V; 96 V; Outro
pt-BR: Classe de tensão da bateria: 12V; 144V; Classe 200–300V; Classe 400V; 48V; 72V; Classe 800V; 96V; Outro
sl-SI: Razred napetosti baterije: 12 V; 144 V; Razred 200–300 V; Razred 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Razred 800 V; 96 V; Drugo
nb: Batterispenningsklasse: 12 V; 144 V; 200–300 V-klasse; 400 V-klasse; 48 V; 72 V; 800 V-klasse; 96 V; Annet
ko: 배터리 전압 등급: 12V; 144V; 200~300V 클래스; 400V 클래스; 48V; 72V; 800V 클래스; 96V; 기타
es: Clase de voltaje de la batería: 12 V; 144 V; Clase 200-300 V; Clase 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Clase 800 V; 96 V; Otro
sk-SK: Trieda napätia batérie: 12 V; 144 V; Trieda 200 – 300 V; Trieda 400 V; 48 V; 72 V; Trieda 800 V; 96 V; Iné
lt-LT: Baterijos įtampos klasė: 12 V; 144 V; 200–300 V klasė; 400 V klasė; 48 V; 72 V; 800 V klasė; 96 V; Kita
nl: Batterij spanningsklasse: 12V; 144V; 200-300V-klasse; 400V-klasse; 48V; 72V; 800V-klasse; 96V; Overig
hu: Akkumulátor feszültségosztálya: 12 V; 144 V; 200–300 V-os osztály; 400 V-os osztály; 48 V; 72 V; 800 V-os osztály; 96 V; Egyéb
ru: Класс напряжения аккумулятора: 12 В; 144 В; Класс 200–300 В; Класс 400 В; 48 В; 72 В; Класс 800 В; 96 В; Другой
ja: バッテリー電圧クラス: 12V; 144V; 200〜300V クラス; 400V クラス; 48V; 72V; 800V クラス; 96V; その他
tr: Batarya voltajı sınıfı: 12V; 144V; 200-300 V sınıfı; 400 V sınıfı; 48V; 72V; 800 V sınıfı; 96V; Diğer
el: Κλάση τάσης μπαταρίας: 12 V; 144V; Κατηγορία 200–300V; Κατηγορία 400V; 48V; 72V; Κατηγορία 800V; 96V; Άλλο
vi: Lớp điện áp pin: 12V; 144V; Loại 200–300V; Loại 400V; 48V; 72V; Loại 800V; 96V; Khác